Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-2745
Motions.

(1) Any party may file any motion permitted under rules adopted by the Supreme Court for pre-answer motions.

(2) A motion for summary judgment must be filed no later than ninety days before trial.

Laws 2020, LB912, § 5.